District of Columbia statutes.
47-2830

Rental or leasing of motor vehicle without driver.

(a)

The owners or managers of establishments where automobiles or other motor vehicles are kept for rent or lease without a driver shall pay a license fee of $600 biennially for each such establishment; provided, that nothing in this section shall be so construed as to exempt such owners or managers from paying additional license taxes required by this chapter.

(b)

Any license issued pursuant to this section shall be issued as a Motor Vehicles Sales, Services and Repair endorsement to a basic business license under the basic business license system as set forth in subchapter I-A of this chapter.

July 1, 1902, 32 Stat. 626, ch. 1352, § 7, par. 32
July 1, 1932, 47 Stat. 557, ch. 366
Sept. 14, 1976, D.C. Law 1-82, title I, § 104(s), 23 DCR 2461
Sept. 26, 1995, D.C. Law 11-52, § 302(f), 42 DCR 3684
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2003(pp)(27), 46 DCR 3142
Oct. 28, 2003, D.C. Law 15-38, § 3(hh)(4)(P), 50 DCR 6913
Mayor, Council and other offices, application of certain sections to boards, commissions and committees, see § 1-321.02.
Motor fuel tax, public hackers not affected, see § 47-2313.
1981 Ed., § 47-2830.
1973 Ed., § 47-2332.
D.C. Law 15-38, in subsec. (b), substituted “Motor Vehicle Sales, Service, and Repair endorsement to a basic business license under the basic” for “Class A Motor Vehicle Sales, Services and Repair endorsement to a master business license under the master”.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(hh)(4)(P) of Streamlining Regulation Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-145, August 11, 2003, 50 DCR 6896).